District of Columbia statutes.
22-3224.01

Jurisdiction.

An offense under this subchapter shall be deemed to be committed in the District of Columbia, regardless of whether the offender is physically present in the District of Columbia, if:

(1)

The person to whom a credit card was issued or in whose name the credit card was issued is a resident of, or located in, the District of Columbia;

(2)

The person who was defrauded is a resident of, or located in, the District of Columbia at the time of the fraud;

(3)

The loss occurred in the District of Columbia; or

(4)

Any part of the offense takes place in the District of Columbia.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 124a
as added Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 214(g), 56 DCR 7413
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102(f) of Crime Bill Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-129, June 29, 2009, 56 DCR 5495).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 214(g) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 214(g) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).